en: Salers, Salers cheese
xx: Salers
ar: ساليرس
de: Salers-Käse
ja: サレール
jv: Kéju salers
oc: Salèrn
ru: Салер
tr: Salers peyniri

en: Saint Marcellin
xx: Saint-Marcellin, Saint Marcellin
ar: ساينت مارسيلين
fr: Saint Marcellin IGP
zh: 圣马尔瑟兰

en: Stilton, Stilton cheese
de: Stilton
fr: stilton
hr: stilton
it: stilton

en: Blue Stilton, Blue Stilton cheese
de: Blue Stilton
fr: fromage blue stilton
hr: plavi stilton
it: blue Stilton

en: White Stilton, White Stilton cheese
de: White Stilton, White-Stilton-Käse
hr: bijeli stilton
it: stilton bianco

en: taleggio
xx: taleggio
de: Taleggio, Taleggio Käse
es: queso taleggio
fr: taleggio, fromage taleggio aop
he: טלג'יו
hu: taleggio, taleggio sajt
ja: タレッジョ
ko: 탈레조
ru: таледжо
uk: таледжіо

en: tilsit
bg: Тилзитер, Тилзит, сирене Тилзит
cs: Tilsiter
de: Tilsiter
eo: Tilziter
es: Queso Tilsit
fi: tilsit, tilsiter
fr: Tilsit
hr: tilsit
hu: Tilsiter, Tilsiter sajt
id: Tilsiter
it: Tilsiter
ja: ティルジットチーズ
ko: 틸지터
la: Tilsiter
lt: Tilžės sūris
nb: Tilsiter
pl: Ser tylżycki
pt: Tilsit
ru: Тильзитер
sr: Tilsiter
sw: Tilsiter
uk: Тільзитер

en: tomme
xx: Tomme
br: toma
he: טום
hu: tomme sajt
ja: Tommé
ru: Том

en: tomme de Savoie, tomme de Savoie IGP
xx: tomme de Savoie, tomme de Savoie IGP

fr: Vacherin fribourgeois AOP
xx: Vacherin fribourgeois AOP
de: Vacherin fribourgeois AOP
ja: ヴァシュラン・フリブール
ko: 바슈랭 프리부르주아

en: blue cheese
af: Bloukaas
ar: جبنة زرقاء
be: Блакітныя сыры
bg: синьо сирене
ca: formatge blau
cs: Sýr s modrou plísní
da: blåskimmelost
de: Blauschimmelkäse
el: Μπλε τυρί
eo: blua fromaĝo
es: queso azul
et: Sinihallitusjuust
eu: Gazta urdin
fa: پنیر آبی
fi: sinihomejuusto, homejuusto
fr: fromage à pâte persillée, bleu, Fromage bleu, fromage bleu
gl: Queixo azul
he: גבינה כחולה
hr: plavi sir
hy: կապույտ պանիրներ
ia: Caseo blau
is: Gráðostur
it: formaggio a pasta erborinata, Formaggio erborinato
ja: ブルーチーズ
jv: Kèju biru
ko: 블루 치즈
lo: ເນີຍແຂງຟ້າແກ່
mk: сино сирење
nb: blåmuggost
nl: Blauwschimmelkaas, Blauwe kaas
nn: blåmuggost
pl: Niebieski ser, ser pleśniowy błękitny, ser pleśniowy typu blue cheese
pt: queijo azul
ro: Brânză cu mucegai
ru: Голубые сыры
sr: бупави сир
sv: Blågrön mögelost, blåmögelost
th: บลูชีส
tt: зәңгәр сыр
uk: Блакитні сири
vi: Pho mát xanh
zh: 藍乾酪

en: Blue cheese from cow's milk
fr: Fromage bleu au lait de vache
hr: plavi sir od kravljeg mlijeka

en: bleu d'auvergne
xx: bleu d'auvergne
ar: بلو دوفيرن
ca: blau d'Alvèrnia
eo: Aŭvernja blua fromaĝo
ja: ブルー・ドーヴェルニュ
ko: 블뢰 도베르뉴
oc: Blau d'Auvèrnhe
ru: Блё д'Овернь
uk: Блю де Овернь
zh: 布勒·德·奧福格芝士

en: fourme d'ambert
xx: fourme d'ambert
ar: فورم دامبيرت
hy: Ֆուրմ-դ'Ամբեր
ja: フルム・ダンベール
ko: 푸름 당베르
oc: Forma d'Embèrt
ru: Фурм-д’Амбер
uk: Фурм д'Амбер
zh: 昂贝尔奶酪

en: fourme de Montbrison
xx: fourme de Montbrison
ar: فورم د مونتبريسون
hy: Ֆուրմ դը Մոնբրիզոն
ja: フルム・ド・モンブリゾン
ru: Фурм-де-Монбризон
uk: Фурм-де-Монбрізон

en: bleu de Bresse
xx: bleu de Bresse, Bresse Bleu
ar: بليو د بريس
he: ברס בלו
ja: ブレス・ブルー
ru: Бресс Блё
zh: 布勒·德·布瑞塞芝士

en: bleu de gex
xx: bleu de gex, Bleu du Haut-Jura, Bleu de septmoncel
ar: بليو د جيكس
az: Blyö de Jeks
hy: Բլյո դը Ժեքս
ru: Блё де Жекс
uk: Бле-де-Жекс
zh: 布勒·德·吉克斯芝士

fr: base aromatisante fromage
ca: base aromatitzant de formatge
es: base aromatizante de queso
nl: kaassmaak

fr: préparation fromagère
ca: preparació de formatges
de: käsezubereitung
es: preparación de quesos

en: halloumi, halloumi cheese
af: halloumi
ar: حلوم
bg: халуми
ca: hellim
cs: halloumi
cy: halloumi
de: halloumi
el: χαλλούμι
eo: halumo
es: halloumi
fi: halloumi, halloumijuusto
fr: halloumi
he: חלומי
hr: halloumi
id: halloumi
is: halloumi
it: halloumi
ja: ハルーミ
ko: 할루미
ku: helîme
la: chalumium
nb: halloumi
nl: halloumi
pl: halloumi, ser halloumi
pt: halloumi
ru: халлуми
sv: halloumi
tr: hellim
uk: халлумі
ur: حلومی
zh: 哈羅米芝士